trunk/apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix
<pardef n="be/ure__vblex">
      
  <e>       <p><l>uríem</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uria</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uríeu</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uries</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>urien</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uria</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>urem</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uré</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ureu</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uràs</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uran</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>urà</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    
  <e>       <p><l>vent</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>vent</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guérem</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guí</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guéreu</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gueres</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gueren</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gué</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guem</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guem</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>veu</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>veu</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guin</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guen</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guin</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guen</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>gui</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>        <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>gui</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>        <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ure</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ure</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>víem</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>via</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>víeu</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>vies</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>vien</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>via</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guéssim</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guérem</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>gués</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guera</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guéssiu</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guéreu</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guessis</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gueres</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guessin</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gueren</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>gués</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guera</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>gudes</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guda</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guts</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>gut</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>vem</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>veu</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uen</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guem</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>gui</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>        <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>gueu</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guis</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gues</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guin</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guen</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>gui</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>        <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    
</pardef>

<e lm="beure">           <i>be</i><par n="be/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deure">           <i>de</i><par n="be/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="moure">           <i>mo</i><par n="be/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="promoure">        <i>promo</i><par n="be/ure__vblex"/></e>
